Alaska statutes. Title 37. Public Finance.
Chapter 30. Local Government Bonding.

Secs. 37.30.010 — 37.30.090.
Anticipatory borrowing.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 118 SLA 1972.]

Sec. 37.30.100.
Prohibited bidding on bonds.

A person who provides financial programming or marketing assistance to a political subdivision of the state, whether home rule or otherwise, in connection with the issuance or sale of general obligation bonds, revenue bonds, or bond anticipation notes of the political subdivision may not bid on the bonds or notes if offered at public sale, or negotiate for their purchase if sold at private sale.

The sale of general obligation, revenue bonds, or bond anticipation notes of a political subdivision to a person prohibited from bidding on, or negotiating for the sale of bonds or notes under (a) of this section is against public policy and the sale is void.

In this section “person” means an individual, firm, agent, factor, intermediary, partnership, corporation, association, bond house, stockbroker, or bond broker.

History.

(§ 2 ch 102 SLA 1974)